Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB287.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
no law enforcement agency or officer shall assist United States
immigration and customs enforcement in the:
(1) Apprehension or arrest of persons for alleged or suspected
immigration violations in or on the premises of a place of religious
worship, school or hospital; or
(2) service of warrants for removal of persons from the United States
in or on the premises of a place of religious worship, school or hospital.
(b) Any current or future memorandum, agreement or contract made
between a law enforcement agency or any state agency or officer and
United States immigration and customs enforcement shall be void to the
extent that the performance of the memorandum, agreement or contract
would violate subsection (a).
(c) Knowingly violating subsection (a) by a law enforcement officer
may be used as grounds for the suspension, revocation or denial of the
certification of such law enforcement officer required by state law.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit law
enforcement agencies or law enforcement officers from enforcing the laws
of this state to the extent authorized by law.
(e) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Law enforcement agency" means any public agency that
employs law enforcement officers. For purposes of this paragraph, "public
agency" includes any state or local agency as defined in K.S.A. 75-5274,
and amendments thereto.
(2) "Law enforcement officer" means the same as defined in K.S.A.
22-2202, and amendments thereto.
(3) "Hospital" means a medical care facility, as defined in K.S.A. 65-
425, and amendments thereto, and any facility that provides medical or
healthcare services, including, but not limited to, a medical clinic,
emergency medical service, urgent care facility, mental health center,

SB 287 2
facility or clinic or a public health department.
(4) "Place of religious worship" includes, but is not limited to, a
church, chapel, meetinghouse, synagogue, temple, mosque or any other
building that is regularly used and clearly identifiable as a place for
religious worship.
(5) "School" means:
(A) Any preschool, elementary school or secondary school
maintained and operated by a school district;
(B) any nonpublic organization that regularly offers preschool
educational or other programs or education satisfying the compulsory
school attendance laws of this state at the elementary or secondary level,
whether or not accredited by the state board of education;
(C) the site of any trade, technical or vocational training offered by a
school, whether or not located on school property; or
(D) the site of any school-sponsored function, event or activity,
whether or not located on school property.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.